Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.094

Tourism development and promotion account—Promotion of tourism industry.

The tourism development and promotion account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from RCW 36.102.060(10) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by the department of commerce only for the purposes of expanding and promoting the tourism industry in the state of Washington. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the tourism development and promotion account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

[ 2011 c 5 s 913; 2009 c 565 s 6; 2007 c 228 s 202; 2003 c 153 s 4; 1997 c 220 s 223 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 5: See note following RCW 43.03.220.

Findings—2003 c 153: See note following RCW 43.330.090.

Referendum—Other legislation limited—Legislators' personal intent not indicated—Reimbursements for election—Voters' pamphlet, election requirements—1997 c 220: See RCW 36.102.800 through 36.102.803.